Utah statutes.
26-1-17.5.   Confidential records.

(1)  A record classified as confidential under this title shall remain confidential, and be released according to the provisions of this title, notwithstanding Section 63G-2-310.

(2)  In addition to those persons granted access to records described in Subsection 63G-2-302(1)(b), immunization records may be shared among schools, school districts, and local and state health departments and the state Department of Human Services as necessary to assure compliance with Section 53A-11-301 and to prevent, investigate, and control the causes of epidemic, infectious, communicable, and other diseases affecting the public health.



Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

